Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 28. Health Care Commission

Termination of article. —

W.S.

9-2-2804

, as enacted by Laws 2003, ch. 122, § 1, and amended by Laws 2006, ch. 68, § 1, provided for the repeal of W.S.

9-2-2801

through

9-2-2804

, effective June 30, 2009.

§§ 9-2-2801 through 9-2-2803.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 68, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from
Laws 2003, ch. 122, § 1, related to health care commission created, membership, salary, meetings, advisory committees. It was repealed pursuant to §

9-2-2804

, effective June 30, 2009.

§ 9-2-2804.
Termination of article.

W.S.

9-2-2801

through 9-2-2803 are repealed effective June 30, 2009.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 122, § 1; 2004, Sp. Sess., ch. 4, § 8; 2006, ch. 68, § 1.

The 2004 Sp. Sess. amendment

substituted “June 30, 2006” for “June 30, 2005.”

Laws 2004, ch. 4, § 10, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved July 29, 2004.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, substituted “2009” for “2006.”